Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3511
Disposition, defined.

Disposition shall mean information disclosing that criminal proceedings have been concluded, including information disclosing that the police have elected not to refer a matter to a prosecutor or that a prosecutor has elected not to commence criminal proceedings, and also information disclosing the nature of the termination of the proceedings.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 11.